Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 20266-107
Notification to creditors.

(a) Unless a creditor waives in a signed record the right to notification, an assignee shall send a notification of the assignment to each creditor known to the assignee within a reasonable time not to exceed thirty days after the effective date of the assignment agreement.

(b) The notification must:

(1) be in a record signed by the assignee;

(2) include the assignee's name, address, and other contact information reasonably necessary to communicate with the assignee;

(3) provide reasonable instructions for submitting a proof of claim using the method established by the assignee under subdivision (b)(5) of section 6-109; and

(4) identify the date established under subdivision (b)(6) of section 6-109 by which each creditor whose claim is not otherwise allowed without a timely proof of claim under the Uniform Assignment for Benefit of Creditors Act must submit a proof of claim.

(c) An assignee shall use reasonable means to provide the information in subsection (b) of this section to unknown creditors, including by any means the assignor regularly used to:

(1) provide information to the assignor's creditors; or

(2) communicate information about the assignor, other than advertising, to the public.

Laws 2026, LB783, § 7.
July 18, 2026